src/fst/affixes/codifieds.lexc
! Codifieds are inflected with a colon, depending on the last letter
! of the word (or inflection class of the thing)

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Common
+Sg+Nom:  Ennd  ;
  Compounding/Dashed  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/a
  CodifiedAcroStem/A  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/A
  CodifiedAcroStem/Common  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Clitic/Obligatory  ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:n  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Par:%:ta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:han  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Pl+Par:%:ita  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:ihin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/b
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/B
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/c
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/C
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/d
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/D
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/e
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/E
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/g
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/G
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/p
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/P
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/v
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/V
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/w
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/W
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/t
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/T
  CodifiedAcroStem/ee  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/ee
  CodifiedAcroStem/Common  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Clitic/Obligatory  ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:n  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Par:%:tä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:hen  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Pl+Par:%:itä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:ihin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:istä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/i
  CodifiedAcroStem/ii  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/I
  CodifiedAcroStem/ii  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/j
  CodifiedAcroStem/ii  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/J
  CodifiedAcroStem/ii  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/ii
  CodifiedAcroStem/Common  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Clitic/Obligatory  ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:n  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Par:%:tä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:hin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Pl+Par:%:itä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:ihin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:istä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/h
  CodifiedAcroStem/oo  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/H
  CodifiedAcroStem/oo  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/k
  CodifiedAcroStem/oo  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/K
  CodifiedAcroStem/oo  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/o
  CodifiedAcroStem/oo  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/O
  CodifiedAcroStem/oo  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/å
  CodifiedAcroStem/oo  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Å
  CodifiedAcroStem/oo  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/oo
  CodifiedAcroStem/Common  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Clitic/Obligatory  ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:n  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Par:%:ta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:hon  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Pl+Par:%:ita  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:ihin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/q
  CodifiedAcroStem/uu  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Q
  CodifiedAcroStem/uu  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/u
  CodifiedAcroStem/uu  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/U
  CodifiedAcroStem/uu  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/uu
  CodifiedAcroStem/Common  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Clitic/Obligatory  ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:n  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Par:%:ta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:hun  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Sg+Abe:%:tta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:lta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:lla  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:sta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:na  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Pl+Par:%:ita  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:ihin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Pl+Abe:%:itta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:ilta  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:ina  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:ista  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issa  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/f
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/F
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/l
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/L
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/m
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/M
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/n
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/N
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/r
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/R
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/s
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/S
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/š
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Š
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/x
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/X
  CodifiedAcroStem/äX  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/äX
  CodifiedAcroStem/Common  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Clitic/Obligatory  ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:n  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Par:%:ää  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:ään  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Pl+Par:%:iä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:iin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:istä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/y
  CodifiedAcroStem/Y  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Y
  CodifiedAcroStem/Common  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:  Clitic/Obligatory  ;
+Pl+Nom:%:t  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Nom:%:n  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Par:%:tä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ill:%:hin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Sg+Abe:%:ttä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Abl:%:ltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ade:%:llä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+All:%:lle  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ela:%:stä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ess:%:nä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Ine:%:ssä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:ksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Sg+Tra:%:kse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;
+Pl+Par:%:itä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ill:%:ihin  Possessive/Optional  ;
+Pl+Abe:%:ittä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Abl:%:iltä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ade:%:illä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+All:%:ille  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ess:%:inä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Cmt:%:ine  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ela:%:istä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ine:%:issä  Possessive/Optional+Vn  ;
+Pl+Ins:%:in  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:iksi  Clitic/Optional  ;
+Pl+Tra:%:ikse  Possessive/Obligatory+Vn  ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/ž
    CodifiedAcroStem/Z   ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/Ž
    CodifiedAcroStem/Z   ;

LEXICON CodifiedAcroStem/z
    CodifiedAcroStem/Z   ;
